Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.094

Program for military personnel—Costs of funding.

The costs of funding programs authorized by RCW 28B.50.092 through 28B.50.094 shall ultimately be borne by grants or fees derived from nonstate treasury sources.

[ 1973 c 105 s 3.]